Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-270
Grantee represented as corporation; conveyance more than ten years from recording; validity.

Where any grantee takes title to real estate in this state under a name including the word company or corporation, whether such grantee was or was not in fact a corporation, and where such grantee subsequent to the date that such title is taken conveys all of such land or part thereof, through a deed executed on behalf of such grantee by any person or persons, after ten years from the recording thereof such deed shall be as good, valid, legal and effectual as though such grantee had been at the time of receiving and conveying said land, a corporation de jure, and said deed conveying said land had been executed and acknowledged on its behalf by the officers and in the manner provided by law.

Laws 1937, c. 166, § 1, p. 634;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-275;

R.S.1943, § 76-270;

Laws 1947, c. 245, § 1, p. 769.